langs/is/Fallbeyging_kk_sb_01_-s.aff
SFX X N 12
SFX X	0	0/14	.
SFX X	0	0/15	.
SFX X	ur	ar/12    ur
SFX X	n	ar/12	nn
SFX X   0	ar/12	u[^r] 
SFX X   0	ar/12	n[^n] 
SFX X   0	ar/12	[^un].
SFX X	ur	ar/13    ur
SFX X	n	ar/13	nn
SFX X   0	ar/13	u[^r] 
SFX X   0	ar/13	n[^n] 
SFX X   0	ar/13	[^un].
